Vermont, session 2025-2026, H234.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 941 is amended to read:
§ 941. UNIT DETERMINATION, CERTIFICATION, AND
REPRESENTATION
VT LEG #379946 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.234
2025 Page 2 of 2
(a) The Board shall determine issues of unit determination, certification,
and representation in accordance with this chapter.
(b)(1) No bargaining unit or collective bargaining representative shall be
recognized by the employer until the Board has determined the appropriate unit
to be represented and has formally certified its determination.
(2) In considering the appropriateness of a bargaining unit, the Board
shall permit adjunct faculty at the University of Vermont and Vermont State
Colleges to be eligible for inclusion in a bargaining unit on the effective date
of an adjunct faculty member’s employment agreement or on the first teaching
day of the adjunct faculty member first class, whichever occurs first.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379946 v.1